Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 36. Dentistry.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to needle stick and sharps injury protections, see AS

18.60.880

—

18.60.890

.

Administrative Code. —

For board of dental examiners, see 12 AAC 28.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which amended provisions in this chapter relating to opioid prescription and education on pain management and opioid use and addiction, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.